New York, session 2025-2026, S1739.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The civil service law is amended by adding a new section 2 137 to read as follows: 3 § 137. Longevity payments. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of 4 law to the contrary, effective the first of April next succeeding the 5 effective date of this section and annually thereafter, each state 6 employee designated managerial or confidential who as of the preceding 7 March thirty-first has completed twelve years or more of continuous 8 service as defined in paragraph (c) of subdivision three of section one 9 hundred thirty of this article in the executive branch of the state 10 government, and has attained a performance rating higher than "Below 11 Minimum" or its equivalent in a graded position shall receive a twelve 12 year performance award of one thousand five hundred dollars. 13 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, effec- 14 tive the first of April next succeeding the effective date of this 15 section and annually thereafter, each state employee designated manage- 16 rial or confidential who as of the preceding March thirty-first has 17 completed seventeen years or more of continuous service as defined in 18 paragraph (c) of subdivision three of section one hundred thirty of this 19 article in the executive branch of the state government, and has 20 attained a performance rating higher than "Below Minimum" or its equiv- 21 alent, shall receive a seventeen year performance award of one thousand 22 five hundred dollars. Such employees shall also continue to receive the 23 twelve-year performance award of one thousand five hundred dollars 24 pursuant to subdivision one of this section. 25 3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, effec- 26 tive the first of April next succeeding the effective date of this EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04577-01-5 S. 1739 2 1 section and annually thereafter, each state employee designated manage- 2 rial or confidential who as of the preceding March thirty-first has 3 completed twenty-two years or more of continuous service as defined in 4 paragraph (c) of subdivision three of section one hundred thirty of this 5 article in the executive branch of the state government, and has 6 attained a performance rating higher than "Below Minimum" or its equiv- 7 alent, shall receive a twenty-two year performance award of one thousand 8 five hundred dollars. Such employees shall also continue to receive 9 both the twelve and seventeen-year performance awards of one thousand 10 five hundred dollars each pursuant to subdivisions one and two of this 11 section. 12 4. Performance awards made pursuant to this section shall be lump-sum, 13 non-recurring payments for employees in full-time status as of March 14 thirty-first each year, or a pro rata share of such amount for employees 15 in part-time employment status on such date, and shall be paid in April 16 of each year. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of April next succeeding 18 the date on which it shall have become a law.